Vermont, session 2025-2026, S279.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 271 is amended to read:
§ 271. MANUFACTURER’S OR RECTIFIER’S LICENSE
* * *
VT LEG #385105 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.279
2026 Page 2 of 2
(g) A licensed manufacturer of malt beverages may distribute an annual
total of not more than 5,000 barrels of the manufacturer’s malt beverages
directly to holders of first- or second-class licenses.
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 2 is amended to read:
§ 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this title:
* * *
(5) “Caterer’s license” means a license issued by the Board of Liquor
and Lottery authorizing the holder of a first-class license or first- and third-
class licenses to serve alcoholic beverages at a function located on premises
other than those occupied by a first-, first- and third-, or second-class licensee
to sell alcoholic beverages an event.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385105 v.1